Rhode Island, session 2025, SB682.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-4.10 of the General Laws entitled "Health Care Power of
Attorney" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-4.10-2.1. Notary public in hospitals.
(a) All hospitals in Rhode Island shall have a notary public on staff and available twenty-
four (24) hours a day and seven (7) days a week.
(b) The notary shall be available through the patient services department to notarize
important healthcare and legal documents including:
(1) Advance directive to hospital personnel;
(2) Powers of attorney; and
(3) Wills.
(c) Upon request the notary public shall visit the patient in their room during the
hospitalization. A valid ID shall be required from the patient and documents shall be signed in the
presence of the notary.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001578
========